Illinois, session 104th, HB5014.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Criminal Code of 2012 is amended by 5changing Section 3-6 as follows: 6    (720 ILCS 5/3-6)7    Sec. 3-6. Extended limitations. The period within which a 8prosecution must be commenced under the provisions of Section 93-5 or other applicable statute is extended under the 10following conditions:11    (a) A prosecution for theft involving a breach of a 12fiduciary obligation to the aggrieved person may be commenced 13as follows:14        (1) If the aggrieved person is a minor or a person 15    under legal disability, then during the minority or legal 16    disability or within one year after the termination 17    thereof.18        (2) In any other instance, within one year after the 19    discovery of the offense by an aggrieved person, or by a 20    person who has legal capacity to represent an aggrieved 21    person or has a legal duty to report the offense, and is 22    not himself or herself a party to the offense; or in the 23    absence of such discovery, within one year after the   HB5014- 2 -LRB104 18463 RLC 31905 b1    proper prosecuting officer becomes aware of the offense. 2    However, in no such case is the period of limitation so 3    extended more than 3 years beyond the expiration of the 4    period otherwise applicable.5    (b) A prosecution for any offense based upon misconduct in 6office by a public officer or employee may be commenced within 7one year after discovery of the offense by a person having a 8legal duty to report such offense, or in the absence of such 9discovery, within one year after the proper prosecuting 10officer becomes aware of the offense. However, in no such case 11is the period of limitation so extended more than 3 years 12beyond the expiration of the period otherwise applicable.13    (b-5)(1) When the victim is under 18 years of age at the 14time of the offense, a prosecution for involuntary servitude, 15involuntary sexual servitude of a minor, or trafficking in 16persons and related offenses under Section 10-9 of this Code 17may be commenced within 25 years of the victim attaining the 18age of 18 years.19    (2) When the victim is under 18 years of age at the time of 20the offense, a prosecution for involuntary servitude, 21involuntary sexual servitude of a minor, or trafficking in 22persons and related offenses under Section 10-9 of this Code 23may be commenced at any time. This paragraph (2) applies to 24prosecutions for such conduct arising on or after January 1, 252026 (the effective date of Public Act 104-241) this 26amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly.   HB5014- 3 -LRB104 18463 RLC 31905 b1    (b-6) When the victim is 18 years of age or over at the 2time of the offense, a prosecution for involuntary servitude, 3involuntary sexual servitude of a minor, or trafficking in 4persons and related offenses under Section 10-9 of this Code 5may be commenced within 25 years after the commission of the 6offense. 7    (b-7) When the victim is under 18 years of age at the time 8of the offense, a prosecution for female genital mutilation 9may be commenced at any time. 10    (b-8) When the victim is under 17 years of age at the time 11of the offense, a prosecution for grooming may be commenced 12within 10 years after the victim attains 17 years of age. 13    (c) (Blank).14    (d) A prosecution for child sexual abuse material or child 15pornography, aggravated child pornography, indecent 16solicitation of a child, soliciting for a sexually exploited 17child, juvenile pimping, exploitation of a child, or promoting 18commercial sexual exploitation of a child except for keeping a 19place of commercial sexual exploitation of a child may be 20commenced within one year of the victim attaining the age of 18 21years. However, in no such case shall the time period for 22prosecution expire sooner than 3 years after the commission of 23the offense.24    (e) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (j), a 25prosecution for any offense involving sexual conduct or sexual 26penetration, as defined in Section 11-0.1 of this Code, where   HB5014- 4 -LRB104 18463 RLC 31905 b1the defendant was within a professional or fiduciary 2relationship or a purported professional or fiduciary 3relationship with the victim at the time of the commission of 4the offense may be commenced within one year after the 5discovery of the offense by the victim.6    (f) A prosecution for any offense set forth in Section 44 7of the Environmental Protection Act may be commenced within 5 8years after the discovery of such an offense by a person or 9agency having the legal duty to report the offense or in the 10absence of such discovery, within 5 years after the proper 11prosecuting officer becomes aware of the offense.12    (f-5) A prosecution for any offense set forth in Section 1316-30 of this Code may be commenced within 5 years after the 14discovery of the offense by the victim of that offense. 15    (g) (Blank).16    (h) (Blank).17    (i) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (j), a 18prosecution for criminal sexual assault, aggravated criminal 19sexual assault, or aggravated criminal sexual abuse may be 20commenced at any time. If the victim consented to the 21collection of evidence using an Illinois State Police Sexual 22Assault Evidence Collection Kit under the Sexual Assault 23Survivors Emergency Treatment Act, it shall constitute 24reporting for purposes of this Section.25    Nothing in this subdivision (i) shall be construed to 26shorten a period within which a prosecution must be commenced   HB5014- 5 -LRB104 18463 RLC 31905 b1under any other provision of this Section.2    (i-5) A prosecution for armed robbery, home invasion, 3kidnapping, or aggravated kidnaping may be commenced within 10 4years of the commission of the offense if it arises out of the 5same course of conduct and meets the criteria under one of the 6offenses in subsection (i) of this Section. 7    (j) (1) When the victim is under 18 years of age at the 8time of the offense, a prosecution for criminal sexual 9assault, aggravated criminal sexual assault, predatory 10criminal sexual assault of a child, aggravated criminal sexual 11abuse, felony criminal sexual abuse, or female genital 12mutilation may be commenced at any time.13    (2) When in circumstances other than as described in 14paragraph (1) of this subsection (j), when the victim is under 1518 years of age at the time of the offense, a prosecution for 16failure of a person who is required to report an alleged or 17suspected commission of criminal sexual assault, aggravated 18criminal sexual assault, predatory criminal sexual assault of 19a child, aggravated criminal sexual abuse, or felony criminal 20sexual abuse under the Abused and Neglected Child Reporting 21Act may be commenced within 20 years after the child victim 22attains 18 years of age.23    (3) When the victim is under 18 years of age at the time of 24the offense, a prosecution for misdemeanor criminal sexual 25abuse may be commenced within 10 years after the child victim 26attains 18 years of age.  HB5014- 6 -LRB104 18463 RLC 31905 b1    (4) Nothing in this subdivision (j) shall be construed to 2shorten a period within which a prosecution must be commenced 3under any other provision of this Section.4    (j-5) A prosecution for armed robbery, home invasion, 5kidnapping, or aggravated kidnaping may be commenced at any 6time if it arises out of the same course of conduct and meets 7the criteria under one of the offenses in subsection (j) of 8this Section.9    (k) (Blank). 10    (l) A prosecution for any offense set forth in Section 1126-4 of this Code may be commenced within one year after the 12discovery of the offense by the victim of that offense. 13    (l-5) A prosecution for any offense involving sexual 14conduct or sexual penetration, as defined in Section 11-0.1 of 15this Code, in which the victim was 18 years of age or older at 16the time of the offense, may be commenced within one year after 17the discovery of the offense by the victim when corroborating 18physical evidence is available. The charging document shall 19state that the statute of limitations is extended under this 20subsection (l-5) and shall state the circumstances justifying 21the extension. Nothing in this subsection (l-5) shall be 22construed to shorten a period within which a prosecution must 23be commenced under any other provision of this Section or 24Section 3-5 of this Code. 25    (m) The prosecution shall not be required to prove at 26trial facts which extend the general limitations in Section   HB5014- 7 -LRB104 18463 RLC 31905 b13-5 of this Code when the facts supporting extension of the 2period of general limitations are properly pled in the 3charging document. Any challenge relating to the extension of 4the general limitations period as defined in this Section 5shall be exclusively conducted under Section 114-1 of the Code 6of Criminal Procedure of 1963.7    (n) A prosecution for any offense set forth in subsection 8(a), (b), or (c) of Section 8A-3 or Section 8A-13 of the 9Illinois Public Aid Code, in which the total amount of money 10involved is $5,000 or more, including the monetary value of 11food stamps and the value of commodities under Section 16-1 of 12this Code may be commenced within 5 years of the last act 13committed in furtherance of the offense.14    (o) A prosecution for any offense based upon fraudulent 15activity connected to COVID-19-related relief programs, to 16include the Paycheck Protection Program, COVID-19 Economic 17Injury Disaster Loan Program, and the Unemployment Benefit 18Programs shall be commenced within 5 years after discovery of 19the offense by a person having a legal duty to report such 20offense, or in the absence of such discovery, within 5 years 21after the proper prosecuting officer becomes aware of the 22offense. However, in no such case is the period of limitation 23so extended more than 10 years beyond the expiration of the 24period otherwise applicable. 25    (p) A prosecution for intimidation of a witness when 26related to a sex offense, as defined in the Sex Offender   HB5014- 8 -LRB104 18463 RLC 31905 b1Registration Act, when the victim is under 18 years of age at 2the time of the offense may be commenced at any time. 3(Source: P.A. 103-184, eff. 1-1-24; 103-1071, eff. 7-1-25; 4104-241, eff. 1-1-26; 104-245, eff. 1-1-26; revised 11-21-25.)